District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.18

Standards of conduct and liability.

Except as otherwise provided in § 29-1008.20:

(1)

The discharge of the duties of a director or member of a committee of the board of directors shall be governed by the law applicable to directors of entities organized under Chapter 3 of this title; and

(2)

The liability of a director or member of a committee of the board of directors shall be governed by the law applicable to directors of entities organized under Chapter 3 of this title.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09, § 29-1001.11, and § 29-1010.08.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 818 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition

Editor's Notes